Hawaii, session 2026, HB583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to increase funding for applied behavioral analysis services for medicaid enrollees who have been diagnosed with autism; provided that the department of human services shall obtain the maximum federal matching funds available for this expenditure. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________